Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see 11 Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

For article, “Insanity, Bifurcation and Due Process: Can Values Survive Doctrine,” see 13 Land & Water L. Rev. 515 (1978).

For case note, “Is the Current Test of the Constitutionality of Capital Punishment Proper? Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1982).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Equal Protection Analysis. Awarding Public Works Contracts: Granting Preference to Resident Bidders. Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 393 (1983).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

For case note, “CRIMINAL LAW — Right to Counsel at Preindictment Lineups — Should Wyoming Change Its Position? Charpentier v. State, 736 P.2d 724,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 437

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 541 (1989).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — Witness Immunity — The Story
of a County Attorney Who Said, 'I Think I Can, I Think I Can,'
and
the Brave Little Conscience that Couldn't be
Shocked. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1992).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of courtroom facilities as affecting rights of accused, 85 ALR3d 918.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of gagging, shackling or otherwise physically restraining accused during course of state criminal trial, 90 ALR3d 17.

Propriety of prosecutor's argument regarding other evidence not presented, 90 ALR3d 646.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument giving jury impression that judge believes defendant guilty, 90 ALR3d 822.

Interference by prosecution with defense counsel's pretrial interrogation of witnesses, 90 ALR3d 1231.

Admissibility, as against interest in criminal case, of declaration of commission of criminal act, 92 ALR3d 1164.

Racial or ethnic prejudice of prospective jurors as proper subject of inquiry or ground of challenge on voir dire in state criminal case, 94 ALR3d 15.

Validity, construction and application of regulation regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 94 ALR3d 1230.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding right to and incidents of jury trial, 3 ALR4th 601.

Right of accused in criminal prosecution to presence of counsel at court-appointed or -approved psychiatric examination, 3 ALR4th 910.

Availability in state court of defense of entrapment where accused denies committing acts which constitute offense charged, 5 ALR4th 1128.

Zoning regulations limiting use of property near airport as taking of property, 18 ALR4th 542.

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

Validity of statute making sodomy a criminal offense, 20 ALR4th 1009.

Validity of state statutes and regulations limiting or restricting public funding for abortions sought by indigent women, 20 ALR4th 1166.

Validity of state statute providing for termination of parental rights, 22 ALR4th 774.

Validity and construction of statute prohibiting employers from suggesting or requiring polygraph or similar tests as condition of employment or continued employment, 23 ALR4th 187.

In personam jurisdiction, under long-arm statute, over nonresident attorney in legal malpractice action, 23 ALR4th 1044.

Propriety of requiring suspect or accused to alter, or to refrain from altering, physical or bodily appearance, 24 ALR4th 592.

Religious activities as doing or transaction of business under “long-arm” statutes or rules of court, 26 ALR4th 1176.

State or municipal towing, impounding, or destruction of motor vehicles parked or abandoned on streets or highways, 32 ALR4th 728.

Enforceability of agreement by law enforcement officials not to prosecute if accused would help in criminal investigation or would become witness against others, 32 ALR4th 990.

Validity and application of statute allowing endangered child to be temporarily removed from parental custody, 38 ALR4th 756.

Validity, construction and application of statutes, or of condominium association's bylaws or regulations, restricting number of units that may be owned by single individual or entity, 39 ALR4th 88.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance making it offense to have possession of open or unsealed alcoholic beverage in public place, 39 ALR4th 668.

Validity and construction of state statute or rule allowing or changing rate of prejudgment interest in tort actions, 40 ALR4th 147.

Consumption or destruction of physical evidence due to testing or analysis by prosecution's expert as warranting suppression of evidence or dismissal of case against accused in state court, 40 ALR4th 594.

Admissibility, in criminal case, of physical evidence obtained without consent by surgical removal from person's body, 41 ALR4th 60.

Validity of state statute providing for periodic payment of future damages in medical malpractice action, 41 ALR4th 275.

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provision prohibiting sales of commodities below cost — modern cases, 41 ALR4th 612.

Validity, construction and application of state statute forbidding unfair trade practice or competition by discriminatory allowance of rebates, commissions, discounts or the like, 41 ALR4th 675.

Validity and construction of state statutory provision forbidding court to stay, pending review, judgment or order revoking or suspending professional, trade or occupational license, 42 ALR4th 516.

Constitutionality, construction and application of statute as to effect of taking appeal, or staying execution, on right to redeem from execution or judicial sale, 44 ALR4th 1229.

Tax on hotel-motel room occupancy, 58 ALR4th 274.

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.

Standing of media representatives or organizations to seek review of, or to intervene to oppose, order closing criminal proceedings to public, 74 ALR4th 476.

Nonconsensual treatment of involuntarily committed mentally ill persons with neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs as violative of state constitutional guaranty, 74 ALR4th 1099.

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in prison proceedings, 9 ALR5th 451.

Rights as to notice and hearing in proceeding to revoke or suspend license to practice medicine, 10 ALR5th 1.

Abutting owner's right to damages for limitation of access caused by traffic regulation, 15 ALR5th 821.

Actions by state official involving defendant as constituting “outrageous” conduct violating due process guaranties, 18 ALR5th 1.

Validity and application of statute or regulation authorizing revocation or suspension of driver's license for reason unrelated to use of, or ability to operate, motor vehicle, 18 ALR5th 542.

Sufficiency, as to content, of notice of garnishment required to be served upon garnishee, 20 ALR5th 229.

Right to compensation for real property damaged by law enforcement personnel in course of apprehending suspect, 23 ALR5th 834.

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provisions limiting amount of recovery in medical malpractice claims, 26 ALR5th 245.

Zoning authority as estopped from revoking legally issued building permit, 26 ALR5th 736.

Validity, construction and application of state statutes prohibiting sale or possession of controlled substances within specified distance of schools, 27 ALR5th 593.

Failure of police to preserve potentially exculpatory evidence as violating criminal defendant's rights under state constitution, 40 ALR5th 113.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 62 ALR5th 671.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose exculpatory photographic evidence as violating due process, 93 ALR5th 527.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose fingerprint evidence as violating due process, 94 ALR5th 393.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose exculpatory ballistic evidence as violating due process, 95 ALR5th 611.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose exculpatory medical reports and tests as violating due process, 101 ALR5th 187.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose pretrial statement made by crime victim as violating due process, 102 ALR5th 327.

Apprendi v. New Jersey, 530 U.S. 466, 120 S. Ct. 2348, 147 L. Ed. 2d 435, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 4304 (2000) and Ring v. Arizona, 536 U.S. 584, 122 S. Ct. 2428, 153 L. Ed. 2d 556, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 4651 (2002) to state death penalty proceedings,110 ALR5th 1.

Defense of good faith in action for damages against law enforcement official under 42 USC § 1983, providing for liability of person who, under color of law, subjects another to deprivation of rights, 61 ALR Fed 7.

Validity, under federal constitution, of so-called “head shop” ordinances or statutes, prohibiting manufacture and sale of drug-use-related paraphernalia, 69 ALR Fed 15.

Delay between seizure of personal property by federal government and institution of proceedings for forfeiture thereof as violative of fifth amendment due process requirements, 69 ALR Fed 373.

Liability of supervisory officials and governmental entities for having failed to adequately train, supervise, or control individual peace officers who violate plaintiff's civil rights under 42 USC § 1983, 70 ALR Fed 17.

Situs of debt or property for purposes of act of state doctrine, 77 ALR Fed 293.

Construction and application of provision of Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, that defendant's confession shall not be inadmissible in evidence in federal criminal prosecution solely because of delay in presentment before magistrate, 124 ALR Fed 263.

Actions brought under
42 U.S.C. §§ 1981-1983 for racial discrimination — Supreme Court cases,
164 ALR Fed 483.

Equal protection and due process clause challenges based on racial discrimination — Supreme Court cases, 172 ALR Fed 1.

Equal protection and due process clause challenges based on sex discrimination — Supreme Court cases, 178 ALR Fed 25.

Forcible administration of antipsychotic medication to pretrial detainees — Federal cases, 188 ALR Fed 285.

Failure of state prosecutor to disclose exculpatory tape recorded evidence as violating due process. 24 A.L.R.6th 1.

II.Particular Statutes and Proceedings Considered.

Comments by judge. —

Defendant's right to a fair and impartial trial was not violated by comments made by a judge during a burglary trial relating to the possible excusing of a doctor as a juror and the fact that someone would be in trouble if the trial ran longer than three days; the comments were not calculated to belittle or disparage defense counsel or create the impression that the defense had no merit.
Fernandez v. State, 2007 WY 198, 172 P.3d 730,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2007).

Divorce proceedings. —

The right to due process extends to and is required in divorce actions. Teton v. Teton, 933 P.2d 1130,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1997).

Divorce granted in favor of the wife was proper where the husband answered the complaint, filed affidavits in support of his position, and was allowed to participate and be heard at trial; thus, his due process rights were not violated, Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 6. Welch v. Welch, 2003 WY 168, 81 P.3d 937,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2003).

In a divorce case, a wife's due process rights under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 6 and the Fourteenth Amendment were violated when a district court entered a default divorce decree based on a supplemental pleading that was not served on the wife; a wife's motion to modify the decree should have been granted because the supplemental affidavit contained claims for relief that were not in the original complaint. Bradley v. Bradley, 2005 WY 107, 118 P.3d 984,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2005).

Where a wife filed a complaint for divorce, where the husband in his answer stated that he did not object to the divorcing being awarded to the wife, where the wife moved for an emergency hearing six days later because she was in the hospital in critical condition and wanted the divorce finalized before she died, and where the district court entered a divorce decree awarding a divorce to the wife and retaining jurisdiction to equitably divide the marital estate after efforts to schedule a hearing with the husband's attorney were unsuccessful, the district court did not err under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 6(c)(2), Wyo. R. Civ. P. 12, or Wyo. R. Civ. P. 56 and did not violate the husband's due process rights under U.S. Const. amend. XIV and Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 6, because the motion for an emergency hearing to award a divorce in a proceeding in which both parties had agreed that a divorce was appropriate was not a motion that would determine the final rights of either party. The final rights of the parties were left to be determined at a later date, and the husband would be afforded a full hearing prior to a determination of his final rights.
Kelly v. Kilts, 2010 WY 151, 243 P.3d 947,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2010).

Statements to law enforcement officers. —

In a case in which defendant was not subject to custodial interrogation, defendant’s motion to suppress was properly denied as defendant’s statements to the troopers were voluntary and not coerced as her free will was not overcome; thus, the troopers did not engage in coercive police tactics and did not violate defendant’s due process rights. Rodriguez v. State, 2018 WY 134, 430 P.3d 766,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2018).

Petitioners lacked standing in custody modification. —

A stepfather and sibling had no standing to pursue a petition to set aside the modification of a custody order granting custody of a minor to the minor's father because such a right is not granted by way of statutes or common law. Rather, the fundamental right to the care and control of a minor is held by the parents, and the only persons allowed to pursue a modification of a custody order are grandparents and primary caregivers. MBB v. ERW, 2004 WY 134, 100 P.3d 415,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2004).

No process at school board informational gathering. —

Where a school board's informational gatherings were not “meetings” that had to be held under the open meeting statute, §

16-4-403

, no process was due because there was no state action which deprived the plaintiffs (parents of a high school student) of any property. Additionally, although under Wyoming law a student has a property interest in obtaining a public education, a student does not have an equal interest in where he receives that education, sufficient to challenge a school board's decision to close a school. Ward v. Board of Trustees, 865 P.2d 618,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1993).

Requirement of accreditation. —

Although requirement of accreditation was a delegation of power made by the Wyoming department of education to the accrediting institution, this delegation did not violate the Wyoming Constitution as the Wyoming Constitution does not directly prohibit delegations of public power to private entities or to public agencies, and any constitutional limitation was therefore indirect; here, applicants had sufficient guarantees of due process, and the delegation of accreditation to private entities was reasonable.
Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Tenure in public office not protected. —

Rights to office are limited; legislature has complete control over them except as specifically limited by constitution and tenure in office is not protected by this section. Cowan v. State, 57 Wyo. 309, 116 P.2d 854,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1941).

Removal of public officers by governor. —

This section was not violated by power of governor to remove officers, conferred by statute. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

Due process right to pretermination notice and hearing. —

A municipal judge has an identifiable property right in his office and, therefore, has a federal constitutional right to due process of law that demands notice of an action for his discharge and a hearing prior to termination of his appointment to office. This section affords equivalent protection in such a case. Town of Upton v. Whisler, 824 P.2d 545,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1992).

Summary judgment was improper on a due process claim where genuine issues of material fact existed as to whether, prior to being deprived of their property interest in their employment in a school lunch cafeteria, several employees received sufficient notice and opportunity to be heard to satisfy due process; there were factual questions regarding notice of the charges, the evidence against the employees, and whether they were allowed to present their side of the story. The employees were told they were terminated when they refused to serve lunch due to alleged mistreatment.
Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 2007).

Right to hearing on change in permanency plan. —

In Wyoming
dependency/neglect proceedings, due process requires that if a change
in a permanency plan includes adoption or permanent placement other
than reunification, parents must have the right to request, and on
request must be provided with, an evidentiary hearing, and a parent
must request the hearing if he or she desires one, because there
may
be instances in which parents do not dispute a recommendation
or are
content with a non-evidentiary hearing, so the failure to
request
such a hearing waives that right. KC v. State (In the Interest of GC), 2015 WY 73, 351 P.3d 236,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2015).

Hearing on
change in goal of a permanency plan from reunification to adoption
did not violate a mother's due process rights because (1) the mother
did not seek a hearing or directly claim the hearing held violated
due process, and (2) lack of a full evidentiary hearing was not plain
error, as such a right was not clear at the time of the hearing,
since
Wyo. R. Evid. 1101(b)(3) said the rules of evidence only applied
to
juvenile adjudicatory hearings. KC v. State (In the Interest of GC), 2015 WY 73, 351 P.3d 236,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2015).

Notice of expiration of livestock brand. —

The state livestock board satisfied the due process rights of the owner of a livestock brand by mailing notice of the expiration date of the brand to the owner's prior address; the brand owner had failed to notify the board of her address change, thus making actual notice unfeasible. Tate v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 932 P.2d 746,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1997).

Inadequate notice for modification of default judgment. —

The modification of a default judgment against one of the co-defendants in a garnishment proceeding in a subsequent hearing which was held for the purpose of considering claims for exemption from garnishment violated the plaintiff's due process rights, as the notice given was not adequate to suggest in any way that the default judgment would be amended or modified. Barker Bros. v. Barker-Taylor, 823 P.2d 1204,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1992).

Service on insurance commissioner without separate notice to
insurer inadequate. —

Personal service under §

26-3-122

must be accomplished by serving the insurance commissioner and providing a notice of service with a copy of the service to the insurer. One or the other is simply insufficient to satisfy due process. Gookin v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Ins. Co., 826 P.2d 229,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1992).

Notice served upon party, not attorney, unconstitutional. —

A trial-setting notice in a divorce action served upon a party, but not upon the party's attorney, violates Rule 5(b), W.R.C.P., and does not satisfy the requirements of constitutional due process. Loghry v. Loghry, 920 P.2d 664,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1996).

Regulating hours of work on public works. —

Statute regulating hours of work on public works did not violate the provisions of this section. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Regulation of use of highways. —

Control of highways may in proper cases be extended to prohibiting their use, and legislature may subject private carriers to appropriate regulations. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Courts must determine in first instance whether legislature can prohibit use of highways in particular case and whether regulating amounting to prohibiting is reasonable. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

State or municipal highway regulations must be reasonable, operate with equality and have tendency to accomplish object in view. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Statute prohibiting use of highways by motor transportation companies, except under certificate and subject to regulation by public service commission, is void as applied to private carriers. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Regulation of seat belt use. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f) does not violate the substantive due process requirements of the United States and Wyoming Constitutions by arbitrarily depriving the defendant of her property by requiring her to pay more than her fair share of the total fault; the legislature's objective in enacting § 31-5-1402(f), so that seat belt nonuse could not be used to establish comparative fault, was legitimate, and the means chosen to do so, the distinction between vehicle occupants who wear seat belts and those who do not, was grounded in a rational basis. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Driver's license revocation proceedings. —

Because a driver's license was not a fundamental right, but a privilege, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xxv), due process was not violated by the utilization of a preponderance of the evidence in commercial driver's license revocation proceedings under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-7-305

and this section.
State v. Robbins, 2011 WY 23, 246 P.3d 864,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2011).

Land development regulation. —

Teton County, Wyo., Land Dev. Reg. § 2450, which limits the square footage of homes that can be built in the jurisdiction, does not violate an area homeowner's due process rights facially because the land use regulation is rationally related to its purpose of preserving the area's beauty, past, microeconomics, and housing market, nor does the regulation violate the homeowner's due process rights as applied because the homeowner failed to present any evidence to meet his burden of showing that the limitations on habitable space in his home violates the constitution beyond a reasonable doubt. Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2003 WY 40, 65 P.3d 720,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2003).

Landowners' right to substantive due process was not violated by the adoption of a county's growth management plan because it provided sufficient guidance for enforcement officials and those subject to regulation; moreover, land-use regulations, including zoning laws, that reasonably promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the populace, even when adversely affecting real property interests, are permissible governmental action, the county had a legitimate interest both in requiring amendment of the subdivision plat in the face of a proposed contrary use and in maintaining public access to the surrounding properties, and there was no showing of bad faith on the part of the county. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

When a board of county commissioners (board) granted a company
proposing to build a wind farm a wind energy conversion system permit,
it was not a violation of due process for the board to accept and
rely on information submitted after a public hearing because (1)
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-506

mandated the procedure to be followed
in such
cases, and (2) there was no allegation that the required
procedures
were not followed. Northern Laramie Range Found. v. Converse Co. Bd. of Co. Comm'rs, 2012 WY 158, 290 P.3d 1063,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2012).

Regulation of motor carriers. —

The provisions of § 56, ch. 65, Laws 1935, regulating motor carriers, which authorized the public service commission to initiate appropriate civil proceedings to enforce obedience to, or for violation of, the act did not violate this section. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Prohibiting automatic filling stations. —

A municipal ordinance prohibiting filling stations without an attendant, thus barring automatic stations, was not so arbitrary as to deny due process of law. Nance v. Cheyenne, 56 F.2d 453, 1931 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1994 (D. Wyo. 1931).

Requirement that railroads fence rights-of-way. —

The fact that railroads are required to fence their rights-of-way while motor transports are not required to fence a highway right-of-way is not discriminatory so as to make the requirement unconstitutional. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Height limitation in noninstrument approach zone to airport
legitimate exercise of police power. —

A city ordinance providing a height limitation in a noninstrument approach zone to an airport was an exercise of the police power, and certain home owners who had a tree in violation of this limitation, who were notified they would have to trim it, and who challenged the constitutionality of the ordinance, failed to demonstrate such a significant impact on their plot as a whole as to counterbalance the significant public interest in protecting the airport flight path. Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

Quarantine and condemnation of animals. —

Former statutes, giving state veterinarian power to quarantine and condemn certain diseased or infected animals, did not violate the United States constitution, or this section as a taking of property without due process of law. Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

The power conferred by statute on sheep inspectors to quarantine sheep infected with or which have been exposed to infectious diseases is not inhibited by the constitution. Richter v. State, 16 Wyo. 437, 95 P. 51,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1908).

Requiring sheep to be dipped annually. —

Former statute, requiring all sheep within state to be dipped annually, did not take private property without due process of law in violation of the United States constitution, and this section. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Requiring construction bond from contractor. —

A statute requiring companies or owners constructing ditches, canals and reservoirs, to take bond from the contractor “in some guarantee or surety company authorized to do business in the state,” violated this section, as a restriction on the liberty of contract. Moreover, the statute created a personal liability for other things than labor and materials which actually went into the work, and thus was a taking of property without due process. George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1912).

Former Fair Trade Act violated this section.

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Providing against unfair competition. —

Section

40-4-107

(repealed), providing against unfair competition, did not violate the due process clause of this section. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

State policy interest furthered by

38-1-101

is sufficient state action

to invoke the federal or Wyoming due process clause. Pete Lien & Sons v. Ellsworth Peck Constr. Co., 896 P.2d 761,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1995).

Requiring disclosure of amount of virgin wool in article offered
for sale. —

Statute requiring disclosure by label of amount of virgin wool contained in woolen articles offered for sale was held valid exercise of police power, not denying due process or privileges of citizens of the State v. W. S. Buck Mercantile Co., 38 Wyo. 47, 264 P. 1023,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1928).

Prohibiting granting or extending of liquor license outside
city limits. —

An act prohibiting the granting or extending of a liquor license outside the limits of a city or town did not violate this section. State ex rel. Jones v. Board of Comm'rs, 18 Wyo. 153, 105 P. 295,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1909).

Authorizing city to condemn land within or without corporate
limits. —

Act authorizing city to condemn land within or without corporate limits is not violative of this or of any other provision of the constitution. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Permitting fee in land to be taken for way of necessity. —

Statute permitting fee in land to be taken for way of necessity does not deny due process of law. Meyer v. Colorado Cent. Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 355, 271 P. 212,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1929).

Termination of temporary total disability benefits. —

Notwithstanding the question of whether or not worker's interest in temporary total disability benefits is a property right, former § 27-12-602 (see now §

27-14-602

) clearly states that a hearing is available. Procedural due process of law is provided if, upon a hearing after termination of temporary total benefits, retroactive relief may be awarded the worker. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Aid-to-Dependent-Children claimant not entitled to hearing
to determine legislative facts. —

The requirement of due process of law that an opportunity be afforded to be heard on issues of adjudicative facts does not necessarily encompass any similar hearing on legislative facts. Where the only questions of fact to which an Aid to Dependent Children claimant claims could be determined at the fair hearing are: (1) that the new assistance unit factors were not properly promulgated under the Administrative Procedure Act; and (2) that the need level, which ultimately determines the amount of the benefit for a given assistance unit, was not properly established, the “facts” which she would have resolved in a hearing are legislative facts. Walker v. Karpan, 726 P.2d 82,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1986).

Mixing adjudicative and investigative roles in administrative
proceeding constitutional. —

Merely because an individual plays both an investigative and an adjudicative role in an administrative proceeding, it does not necessarily follow that due process has been denied. Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

County department of public assistance not bound by interpretative
guideline in state manual. —

A county department of public assistance is not bound by an interpretative rule or guideline in the state social services manual, since such a guideline is not the equivalent of a duly promulgated rule or regulation having the force of law, and the failure of the department to follow the manual's review procedures does not deprive a party of his constitutional rights to due process and equal protection. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Condemnation of land for irrigation ditches. —

A statute providing for the condemnation of land for irrigation ditches was in violation of this section, in failing to provide for notice to the landowner of the time and place when he may be heard as to the amount of his damages, though he is required to be notified of the appointment of appraisers. Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1905).

Permanent injunction. —

In an irrigation company's suit to enjoin land owners from interfering with access, the entry of a permanent injunction at a preliminary hearing was proper, and did not violate the owner's due process rights, where the district court's failure to enter an order of consolidation was not erroneous because the underlying rights of the parties were determined in earlier litigation and were therefore res judicata. Wilson v. Lucerne Canal & Power Co., 2003 WY 126, 77 P.3d 412,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2003).

Authorizing cities to apportion sewer assessments against adjacent
land according to area. —

A statute authorizing certain cities to apportion sewer assessments against adjacent land, according to its area, will not be held unconstitutional, within this section, in absence of a showing of its unconstitutional operation in individual cases. McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

Providing further assessments on land in drainage district
without notice. —

Section

41-9-245

, providing for further assessments on land in a drainage district without notice, in view of notice and hearing had on fixing the first assessment, did not contravene this section when total assessments were less than adjudged benefits. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

A prohibition of water variances

does not violate art. 1, § 7, Wyo. Const., in that it is an exercise of absolute and arbitrary power; does not deny due process by denying a fair opportunity to challenge applicable water quality standards; and does not deny equal protection of the laws by discriminating between water and other pollutant dischargers. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Given various means by which a corporation could present its views as to a water turbidity standard, including opportunity to participate in the promulgation process and to assure that there was procedural compliance, opportunity to obtain judicial review, if it was affected in fact by the rule adopted, and opportunity to seek the amendment or repeal of the rule, the corporation's rights to procedural due process were not infringed by the prohibition of water variances under § 35-11-601(o). United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Setting up revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which fund the city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Prohibiting visitation of private residences by solicitors.
—

An ordinance declaring visitation of private residences by solicitors, peddlers, itinerant merchants and the like for the purpose of soliciting orders for, or selling goods, wares and merchandise, a nuisance and imposing a penalty is valid and not in violation of any constitutional or statutory provision. Town of Green River v. Bunger, 50 Wyo. 52, 58 P.2d 456,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1936).

Requiring snow removal. —

If the Cheyenne ordinance on snow removal were construed as requiring more than reasonable care on the part of an occupant of property to keep his sidewalk free of ice and snow, then in that case the ordinance would be unconstitutional and void. Kalman v. Western Union Tel. Co., 390 P.2d 724,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1964).

Contract relating to excess lands and their disposition. —

The provisions of a contract between a water conservancy district and the United States, relating to excess lands and their disposition, were not violative of this section. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Enjoying property without mining activities not protected.
—

Where objectors had not provided any authority or argument that their interests in enjoying their property without adjacent mining activities had risen to the level of a constitutionally protected property interest, and because a mere allegation of a constitutional violation does not suffice to justify an inquiry, their due process claim was not further considered. Pfeil v. Amax Coal W., 908 P.2d 956,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1995).

Equality of taxation. —

Neither due process nor equal protection imposes upon a state any rigid rule of equality of taxation. The requirement of equal and uniform taxation substantially covers the ground of the due process and equal protection clauses of the federal and state constitutions. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1943). As to requirement of equal and uniform taxation, see § 28 of this article.

Taxation of livestock brought into state to graze. —

An act providing for the taxation of livestock brought into the state to graze did not violate the provisions of this section. Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1898).

Tax lien without notice for unpaid sewer service charges. —

A provision of § 22, ch. 17, Laws 1950, for a tax lien without notice for unpaid sewer service charges violates this section, but the remainder of § 22 may stand as valid, since the parts are separable. In re West Highway Sanitary & Improvement Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1957).

Judgment debtors. —

Judgment debtor was denied due process of law when the district court, without the benefit of a hearing, denied the debtor's Objection to Sale of Property. Lutz v. Schmillen, 915 P.2d 599,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Failing to provide for compensation for United States citizens
residing abroad. —
